Wyoming statutes. Title 17 Corporations, Partnerships and Associations
Chapter 3 Practice of Professions by Corporations

Cross references. —

As to engineering or surveying by corporations, see § 33-29-134.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Issues pertaining to ownership of professional corporation as affected by resignation from corporate practice by active shareholder, 32 ALR4th 921.

§ 17-3-101.
Practice of profession through licensed stockholder or employee authorized.

A corporation organized under the Wyoming Business Corporation Act [chapter 17 of this title] or the Wyoming Statutory Close Corporation Supplement [chapter 17 of this title], whose capital stock is owned exclusively by a person or persons licensed to practice a profession by the state of Wyoming or by an agency, office or instrumentality authorized by the laws of Wyoming to license individuals for the practice of such profession, may, by and through the person or persons of such licensed stockholder or stockholders, or licensed employees, practice and offer professional services in such profession.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 34, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 17-49.1; Laws 1989, ch. 201, § 2.

Revision of title. —

See note under same catchline following title 17 heading.

Quoted

in

Porter Muirhead Cornia & Howard v. State ex rel. Wyo. Bd. of CPAs, 844 P.2d 479,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 196

(Wyo. 1992).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Ungrateful Living: An Estate Planner's Nightmare — The Trial Attorney's Dream,” see XXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 401 (1989).

For comment, “An Innovative Approach to Piercing the Corporate Veil: An Introduction to the Individual Factor and Cumulative Effects Analysis,” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 563 (1990).

§ 17-3-102.
Licensed stockholder or employee subject to certain requirements.

No corporation may offer professional services or practice a profession except by and through the person or persons of its licensed stockholder or stockholders, or licensed employees, each of whom shall retain his professional license in good standing, and shall remain as fully liable and responsible for his professional activities, and subject to all rules, regulations, standards and requirements pertaining thereto, as though practicing individually rather than in a corporation.

History.

Laws 1971, ch. 34, § 2; W.S. 1957, § 17-49.2; Laws 1973, ch. 109, § 1.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

What constitutes professional services within meaning of statute preserving individual liability of professional employees of professional corporation, association or partnership, 31 ALR4th 898.

Liability of professional corporation of lawyers, or individual members thereof, for malpractice or other tort of another member, 39 ALR4th 556.

Professional corporation stockholders' nonmalpractice liability, 50 ALR4th 1276.

Propriety and effect of corporation's appearance pro se through agent who is not attorney, 8 ALR5th 653.

§ 17-3-103.
Words or initials to be contained in corporate name.

The corporate name of every professional corporation shall contain either the words “A Professional Corporation” or the capital initials “P.C.”. These words or initials shall be the last word of the name of the professional corporation.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

§ 17-3-104.
Language to be contained in articles of incorporation; location.

The articles of incorporation of a professional practice corporation incorporated after the date of this act shall contain the following language: “All shareholders of the corporation are, and will continually be, licensed in the profession for which the corporation is formed, and no professional service will be offered by the corporation except by or under the supervision of licensed stockholders or licensed employees.” This language shall be inserted in the articles immediately after the provisions pertaining to the aggregate number of shares which the corporation is authorized to issue.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 1.

Severability. —

Laws 1979, ch. 153, § 5, provides: “If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this act are severable.”